Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-133
Adjutant General; armories and equipment; assignment; military emergency
vehicles; designation.

(1) The Adjutant General shall assign
to each organization an armory and such other equipment as may be necessary
to comply with the requirements of United States laws or regulations for National
Guard units allotted to the State of Nebraska.

(2)(a) The Adjutant
General may designate any publicly owned military vehicles of the National
Guard described in subdivision (b) of this subsection as military emergency
vehicles. Military emergency vehicles shall be operated as emergency vehicles
only when responding to a public disaster, war, riot, invasion, insurrection,
or resistance of process or in case of imminent danger of the occurrence of
any of such events. The Adjutant General shall develop and enforce standard
operating procedures for military emergency vehicles.

(b) Vehicles
eligible for designation as military emergency vehicles shall be limited to
vehicles assigned to:

(i) The Civil Support Team, or any successor
unit; and

(ii) The chemical, biological, radiological, nuclear,
and high-yield explosives enhanced response force package, commonly known
as the CERFP unit, or any successor unit.

Laws 1929, c. 189, § 21, p. 662;

C.S.1929, § 55-127;

R.S.1943, § 55-152;

Laws 1969, c. 459, § 31, p. 1592;

Laws 2008, LB196, § 1.